Maine, session 132, LD1810.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA §9-B, as amended by PL 1999, c. 547, Pt. B, §3 and affected by
§80, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 4 MRSA c. 1, sub-c. 3 is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 3
COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT
§71. Definitions
As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Commission. "Commission" means the Commission on Judicial Conduct
established by Title 5, section 12004-G, subsection 23-B and described in section 72.
2. Grounds for discipline. "Grounds for discipline" has the same meaning as
described in section 73, subsection 5.
3. Independent source. "Independent source" means a person other than a member
of the commission, commission staff or the judge.
4. Judge. "Judge" or "the judge" means the active or active retired Probate Court
Judge, District Court Judge, Superior Court Justice or Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court
who is the subject of allegations in a proceeding initiated under section 75, subsection 1 or
section 77, subsection 1.
§72. Commission on Judicial Conduct
1. Membership. The Commission on Judicial Conduct, established by Title 5, section
12004-G, subsection 23-B, consists of 9 members appointed as follows:
A. An active Superior Court Justice, appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme
Judicial Court;
B. An active District Court Judge, appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme
Judicial Court;
C. An active Probate Court Judge, appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme
Judicial Court;
D. Three members who are attorneys licensed to practice law in this State and members
in good standing of the bar of this State, appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme
Judicial Court; and
E. Three members of the public, who may not be members of the bar of this State,
appointed by the Governor.
2. Alternate members. The appointing authority under subsection 1, paragraphs A
to E shall appoint one alternative member in that membership category, who serves on the
commission in the event that a commission member from the same membership category
Page 1 - 132LR0937(01)

317 is, pursuant to the rules adopted by the commission, disqualified from participating in a
328 particular proceeding before the commission.
3. Terms. Members are appointed for 6-year terms. A member may not serve more
than one term in office consecutively, except that a member appointed to fill a vacancy
under subsection 4 may thereafter be reappointed to serve a single term after the expiration
of the term for which the member filled the vacancy.
4. Vacancies. In the event of a vacancy during an unexpired term of a member, the
appointing authority may fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term.
5. Chair. Every 3 years, or sooner if there is a vacancy in the office of chair, the
commission members shall elect one member to serve as chair for at least one 3-year term.
§73. Scope of authority
1. Scope of authority. The commission's authority over judicial conduct is governed
by this subsection.
A. The commission may receive information, investigate, conduct hearings and make
recommendations to the Supreme Judicial Court concerning allegations that a judge
has engaged in actions or omissions that constitute grounds for discipline and
allegations of mental or physical disability affecting the judicial performance of all
Justices of the Supreme Judicial Court, Justices of the Superior Court, Judges of the
District Court and Judges of the Probate Court, including any active retired justice or
judge.
B. The commission's authority in paragraph A applies to the conduct of a Justice of
the Supreme Judicial Court, Justice of the Superior Court, Judge of the District Court
or Judge of the Probate Court during the judge's term of office and to the judge's
conduct as an attorney at law before or during the judge's term of office.
2. Other authority unaffected. This subchapter may not be construed to limit or
abrogate the inherent authority of the Supreme Judicial Court to supervise and discipline
judges; the authority of the Legislature to remove a judge by impeachment; the authority
of the Governor to remove a judge upon the address of both branches of the Legislature; or
any supervisory authority provided by law or court rule of the Chief Justice of the Superior
Court or the Chief Judge of the District Court.
3. Precedent. In exercising its authority under this subchapter, the commission shall
give substantial weight to any relevant decisions of the Supreme Judicial Court or a
grievance panel of the Board of Overseers of the Bar.
4. Limitations period. The commission may not consider complaints arising out of
acts or omissions occurring more than one year prior to the date commission proceedings
are initiated under section 75, subsection 1 or section 77, subsection 1 unless:
A. The complaint alleges a pattern of recurring conduct, the most recent occurrence of
which occurred within the one-year period described in this subsection; or
B. The commission determines that good cause supports consideration of additional
conduct predating the one-year period described in this subsection.
5. Grounds for discipline. In the absence of fraud, corrupt motive, bad faith or a clear
indication that a judge's conduct violates the Maine Code of Judicial Conduct, the
Page 2 - 132LR0937(01)

413 commission may not take action against a judge based on the judge's findings of fact,
424 conclusions of law or application of the law as understood by the judge. The commission
435 may take action against a judge based on the judge's:
A. Conviction of murder or a Class A, Class B or Class C crime;
B. Willful misconduct in office;
C. Willful misconduct that, although not related to judicial duties, brings the judicial
office into disrepute;
D. Conduct prejudicial to the administration of justice or conduct unbecoming a
judicial officer, whether conduct in office or conduct outside of judicial duties that
brings the judicial office into disrepute; or
E. Conduct that constitutes a violation of the Maine Code of Judicial Conduct or the
Maine Rules of Professional Conduct.
§74. Commission responsibilities; executive director; immunity
1. Commission; powers and duties. In addition to any other powers or duties
specified in this subchapter, the commission has the following powers and duties.
A. The commission shall receive complaints and may conduct investigations and
hearings and make recommendations concerning allegations that a judge has engaged
in actions or omissions that constitute grounds for discipline and allegations of mental
or physical disability affecting a judge's judicial performance.
B. The commission shall hire an executive director who serves at the pleasure of the
commission. The executive director must be an attorney licensed to practice law in
this State and a member in good standing of the bar of this State but may not be engaged
in the active practice of law while employed as the executive director.
C. The commission shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this subchapter,
including rules establishing reasonable time limits for all stages of commission
proceedings and standards for extending those time limits. Rules adopted pursuant to
this paragraph are exempt from the requirements of Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-
A but must be approved by the Supreme Judicial Court.
2. Executive director; powers and duties. In addition to any powers and duties
prescribed by the commission, the executive director of the commission hired pursuant to
subsection 1, paragraph B has the following powers and duties.
A. The executive director may receive information, allegations and complaints on
behalf of the commission; make preliminary evaluations of and screen complaints;
conduct investigations; and recommend dispositions to the commission.
B. The executive director may, with the approval of the commission, employ special
counsel, private investigators or other experts and clerical staff as necessary to
investigate and process matters before the commission and before the Supreme Judicial
Court. The executive director may not employ persons employed by the Attorney
General or any law enforcement officers for these purposes.
C. The executive director shall maintain the commission's records; maintain statistics
concerning the operation of the commission; prepare the commission's budget for
Page 3 - 132LR0937(01)

412 approval by the commission and administer its funds; and prepare the annual report of
423 the commission's activities required by subsection 4 for the commission's approval.
3. Absolute immunity. Commission members, the executive director, other
commission staff and hearing officers appointed by the Supreme Judicial Court are immune
from suit for all conduct in the course of their official duties under this subchapter.
4. Annual report. By January 15th of each year, the commission shall submit to the
Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court and the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over judiciary matters an annual report of the commission's
activities together with any recommendations for improving judicial oversight in the State,
including recommendations for amending court rules and procedures and state laws
governing judicial oversight. The joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over judiciary matters may report out legislation on matters related to the report
to any regular or special session of the Legislature.
§75. Prehearing procedures
1. Initiation of proceedings. Commission proceedings may be initiated by oral or
written complaint alleging facts that, if true, would be grounds for discipline. Commission
proceedings may also be initiated by the commission's own motion when the commission
receives reasonable information, including reports in the news media, regarding conduct
that would be grounds for discipline. Upon receipt of such a complaint or approval of the
commission's own motion, the commission shall conduct a prompt inquiry, investigation
and evaluation.
2. Notice. The commission shall promptly notify the judge of the proceedings and the
subject matter of any complaint received or motion approved under subsection 1 regarding
the judge unless one of the following is true:
A. The commission determines that, due to the nature of the allegations supporting the
complaint or motion, delay is necessary to preserve evidence. Notice may be delayed
by the commission under this paragraph until the evidence to be preserved is obtained,
the proceedings are dismissed or a sworn complaint or statement of allegations is
served on the judge pursuant to subsection 7; or
B. The commission determines that the identity of the complainant can be readily
determined by the judge and there is a danger of reprisal against the complainant.
Notice may be delayed by the commission under this paragraph until the danger of
reprisal ends, the proceedings are dismissed or a sworn complaint or statement of
allegations is served on the judge pursuant to subsection 7. If the commission
determines that there is an ongoing danger of reprisal, the notice provided under this
subsection and the sworn complaint or statement of allegations served under subsection
7 may be drafted in a manner that conceals the identity of the complainant.
3. Screening. The commission shall discourage and promptly dismiss complaints that
the commission determines are frivolous, unfounded or not within the commission's
jurisdiction. The commission shall notify the judge and the complainant, if any, of the
dismissal and of the reason for the dismissal.
4. Subpoena power; oaths. At any stage of the proceeding, the commission may,
within the time limits established by the commission by rule, compel by subpoena the
attendance and testimony of witnesses, including the judge who is the subject of the
Page 4 - 132LR0937(01)

415 proceeding, and the inspection or production of documents, books, accounts, written or
426 electronically recorded statements and other records; administer oaths; and examine any
437 person under oath.
5. Evaluation; decision to proceed. After conducting a thorough inquiry,
investigation and evaluation, the executive director shall recommend to the commission
and the commission shall decide by majority vote whether there is adequate reason to
proceed to the preparation of a detailed complaint or statement of allegations.
6. Detailed complaint or statement of allegations. If a majority of the commission
votes in favor of proceeding to the preparation of a detailed complaint or statement of
allegations, the commission shall request that the complainant file with the commission a
detailed, sworn complaint against the judge. If a sworn complaint cannot be obtained, the
executive director shall prepare a detailed statement of the allegations against the judge.
The detailed complaint or statement of allegations must clearly set forth each alleged action
or omission that constitutes grounds for discipline, the facts alleged in support of the
allegation and each provision of law, the Maine Code of Judicial Conduct or the Maine
Rules of Professional Conduct allegedly violated.
7. Service; answer; personal appearance. The judge must be promptly served with
a copy of the detailed complaint or statement of allegations. Within 21 days after receiving
the detailed complaint or statement of allegations, the judge shall file a written answer and
any request for personal appearance with the commission.
8. Process prior to formal charges. The judge may be represented by counsel and,
within the time limits established by the commission by rule before the issuance of formal
charges under subsection 11, may compel by subpoena the attendance and testimony of
witnesses through depositions and the inspection or production of documents, books,
accounts, written or electronically recorded statements and other records. The judge may
file written materials for commission consideration before the issuance of formal charges
under subsection 11. If the judge requests a personal appearance before the commission
before the issuance of formal charges under subsection 11, the judge's statement and any
statement of the judge's counsel must be recorded.
9. Insufficient cause to proceed. If, at any time prior to the issuance of formal charges
under subsection 11, the commission determines that it lacks sufficient cause to proceed,
the commission must close the investigation, dismiss the complaint or statement of
allegations and notify the judge and any complainant in writing that the commission has
found insufficient cause to proceed. Information obtained by the commission in the course
of an investigation closed prior to the issuance of formal charges under subsection 11 may
not be used in a subsequent commission proceeding unless:
A. The subsequent proceeding involves similar allegations against the judge that
suggest a pattern of recurring conduct constituting grounds for discipline;
B. The subsequent proceeding involves an allegation that the judge violated the
conditions of an informal adjustment pursuant to section 79 arising out of the closed
investigation; or
C. Information about the closed investigation is used solely for purposes of
determining the appropriate sanction to be imposed in the subsequent proceeding.
Page 5 - 132LR0937(01)

10. Amendment of complaint or statement of allegations; response. Upon notice
to the judge, the commission may amend the complaint or statement of allegations prior to
the issuance of formal charges under subsection 11. If the complaint or statement of
allegations is amended, the judge may, within 21 days after receiving the amended
complaint or statement of allegations, amend the judge's written response and, within the
time established by the commission by rule, submit additional written material for the
commission's consideration pursuant to the procedures set forth in subsection 8.
11. Issuance of formal charges. After the expiration of the time established by the
commission by rule for the judge to submit written materials and personally appear before
the commission under subsection 8 in response to a complaint or statement of allegations
or an amended complaint or statement of allegations, the commission shall decide whether
a preponderance of the credible evidence supports a finding that the judge's conduct
constitutes grounds for discipline. If a majority of all commission members votes in favor
of a finding of sufficient cause, the commission shall issue formal charges stating the
allegations for which sufficient cause is found. A copy of the formal charges must be
served promptly on the judge who may, within 10 days after receiving service, file a written
response with the commission.
12. Appointment of hearing officer. Immediately after expiration of the 10-day
response period described in subsection 11, the commission shall file a copy of the formal
charges and of any written response by the judge with the Supreme Judicial Court, which
shall promptly appoint a hearing officer.
§76. Hearing; recommendations; attorney's fees
1. Notice of hearing. After appointment of a hearing officer under section 75,
subsection 12, the commission shall schedule the hearing and provide notice of the date
and time of the hearing to the judge and all counsel who have entered an appearance in the
proceeding. The hearing must be scheduled without undue delay and in a manner that
affords the judge ample opportunity to prepare for the hearing.
2. Amendment of formal charges or response. The hearing officer shall permit the
judge to amend the judge's written response to the formal charges within the time limit
provided by the commission by rule. After commencement of the hearing, the formal
charges may be amended by leave of the hearing officer or with the consent of the judge
only if the amendment is technical in nature and the judge is afforded adequate time to
prepare a response or provide evidence in response to the amendment.
3. Discovery; process. Within the time limits provided by the commission by rule,
the judge and the commission may conduct the same types of discovery available in civil
proceedings in this State. The judge and the commission may, within the time limits
established by the commission by rule, compel by subpoena the attendance and testimony
of witnesses and the inspection or production of documents, books, accounts, written or
electronically recorded statements and other records.
4. Enforcement of process. The Supreme Judicial Court may enforce subpoenas and
other legal process in commission proceedings under this section and section 75 or may
delegate the power to enforce legal process to another appropriate court.
5. Procedure and evidence. The hearing officer appointed by the Supreme Judicial
Court under section 75, subsection 12 shall preside at the hearing, which must be open to
Page 6 - 132LR0937(01)

415 the public, recorded and transcribed and conducted so as to provide due process to the
426 judge. All testimony received at the hearing must be under oath. The Maine Rules of
437 Evidence, including all rules governing privilege that are applicable in civil proceedings
448 apply, except that, if the judge raises the judge's own physical or mental condition as a
459 defense to the formal charges, the judge is deemed to have waived any applicable privilege
560 between the judge as a patient and a health care professional or mental health care
571 professional.
6. Burden of proof. The formal charges must be prosecuted by a member of
commission staff, who must be an attorney, or by special counsel retained by the
commission for this purpose. The commission bears the burden of demonstrating the
grounds for discipline by clear and convincing evidence.
7. Proposed findings and recommendations; objections. At the conclusion of the
hearing, the hearing officer shall submit to the commission and the judge a written
statement of proposed findings and recommendations along with a transcript of the
testimony and all exhibits presented at the hearing. The judge and counsel for the
commission may submit written objections to the hearing officer's findings and
recommendations within 20 days after receiving a copy of those findings and
recommendations. Any objections by the judge or counsel for the commission must be
included in the record submitted to the commission.
8. Commission hearing and decision. After receipt of the hearing officer's proposed
findings and recommendations, the record and any objections, the commission shall
conduct a public hearing at which the judge and the complainant, if any, are afforded an
opportunity to be heard. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
commission shall conduct its deliberations in executive session. If a majority of the
commission votes in favor of finding that the grounds for discipline have been
demonstrated by clear and convincing evidence and in favor of recommending that a
sanction be imposed, the commission shall issue a written decision containing sufficient
findings and recommendations to inform the judge and the Supreme Judicial Court of the
reasons for reaching its findings and recommendations.
9. Referral to Supreme Judicial Court. Within 90 days of the date of the
commission hearing, the commission's written decision under subsection 8 must be
transmitted to the Supreme Judicial Court along with the record of the proceedings, which
must include the transcript of and evidence presented at the hearing before the hearing
officer; the hearing officer's findings and proposed recommendations; any objections by
the judge or counsel for the commission to the hearing officer's findings and proposed
recommendations; the transcript of the hearing before the commission; and the findings
and recommendations of any dissenting members of the commission. The commission
may extend the 90-day period for good cause.
10. Dismissal. If a majority of the members of the commission vote in favor of finding
that the grounds for discipline have not been demonstrated by clear and convincing
evidence or vote in favor of not recommending the imposition of a sanction, the formal
charges must be dismissed and the judge and the complainant, if any, must be notified of
the dismissal by the commission.
11. Informal adjustment. This section may not be construed to prohibit the
commission from disposing of the matter by informal adjustment pursuant to section 79 at
Page 7 - 132LR0937(01)

416 any time prior to submission of the matter to the Supreme Judicial Court under subsection
427 9.
12. Expenses. The following provisions govern expenses in proceedings under this
subchapter.
A. Witnesses are entitled to the same remuneration for fees and expenses as witnesses
in civil actions in state court. The party calling the witnesses is responsible for
remuneration of the witness unless:
(1) The mental or physical ability of the judge is in issue, in which case the
commission is responsible for paying all witnesses, including witnesses called by
the judge, whose testimony relates to the judge's mental or physical ability; or
(2) The Supreme Judicial Court determines that the imposition of expert witness
fees would cause a financial hardship or injustice on the judge, in which case the
commission is responsible for paying those fees.
B. The judge is entitled to receive, without cost, a transcript of all proceedings under
this subchapter.
C. Except as provided in this paragraph, the judge is responsible for payment of the
judge's attorney's fees. With the approval of the Supreme Judicial Court, the judge is
entitled to an award of the judge's reasonable attorney's fees by the State if the matter
is dismissed by the commission at any stage after the filing of a detailed complaint or
statement of allegations; the Supreme Judicial Court disagrees with a recommendation
by the commission to impose discipline; or the Supreme Judicial Court determines that
justice would be served by reimbursement of the judge's reasonable attorney's fees.
§77. Physical or mental disability affecting judicial performance
1. Initiation of proceedings. Commission proceedings may be initiated by oral or
written complaint containing allegations of mental or physical disability affecting the
judge's judicial performance. Commission proceedings may also be initiated by the
commission's own motion when the commission receives reasonable information,
including reports in the news media, that may be grounds for concluding that the judge has
a mental or physical disability affecting the judge's judicial performance. Upon receipt of
such a complaint or approval of the commission's own motion, the commission shall
conduct a prompt inquiry, investigation and evaluation.
2. Provisions of subchapter applicable. The provisions of section 72, subsection 4
and sections 75, 76, 79 and 80 apply, as far as possible, to proceedings involving allegations
of a mental or physical disability affecting a judge's judicial performance, except as
provided in this subsection.
A. If the judge denies an allegation of a mental or physical disability affecting the
judge's judicial performance:
(1) The judge is deemed to have waived any applicable privilege between the judge
as a patient and a health care professional or mental health care professional;
(2) The judge is deemed to have consented to a physical or mental examination by
a qualified health care professional designated by the commission. Copies of any
report prepared by the designated health care professional must be provided to both
the judge and the commission; and
Page 8 - 132LR0937(01)

(3) The commission shall require the judge to produce all relevant medical records.
B. The commission shall reimburse the judge for the reasonable expenses of any
witnesses called by the judge whose testimony relates to the judge's alleged mental or
physical disability.
C. If the judge is not represented by counsel, the commission shall appoint an attorney
to represent the judge at public expense.
§78. Proceedings involving Supreme Judicial Court Justice
If a majority of the commission votes in favor of imposing discipline and submits a
matter to the Supreme Judicial Court under section 76, subsection 9 and the matter involves
the conduct of or the physical or mental disability of an Associate Justice of the Supreme
Judicial Court, the Associate Justices of the Supreme Judicial Court may not participate in
the resolution of the proceeding. The Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court shall
identify, from among all Justices of the Superior Court and all Judges of the District Court,
the 6 judges or justices with the most judicial experience and shall appoint those 6 judges
or justices to serve in place of the associate justices.
§79. Dismissal; informal adjustment; recommended sanction
1. Dismissal. The commission may dismiss a proceeding under section 75, 76 or 77
as unjustified or unfounded at any time prior to submission of the matter to the Supreme
Judicial Court under section 76, subsection 9.
2. Informal adjustment. At any time prior to submission of the matter to the Supreme
Judicial Court under section 76, subsection 9, the commission may, with the agreement of
the judge, terminate the matter and either accept the judge's voluntary retirement or impose
one or more of the following types of discipline on a judge:
A. Issuing a private reprimand;
B. Admonishing the judge that the judge's conduct is or may be grounds for discipline;
or
C. Imposing conditions on the judge's future conduct.
3. Recommended sanction. The hearing officer may propose and a majority of the
commission may recommend that the Supreme Judicial Court impose one or more of the
following types of discipline on a judge:
A. Removal;
B. Retirement;
C. Imposition of attorney discipline under the Maine Rules of Professional Conduct;
D. Imposition of limitations or conditions on the performance of judicial duties;
E. Public or private reprimand or censure;
F. Imposition of a fine;
G. Assessment of costs and expenses; or
H. Imposition of any other sanction that is reasonable and lawful.
§80. Confidentiality
Page 9 - 132LR0937(01)

1. Confidentiality prior to filing formal charges. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary and except as provided in subsection 2, all commission proceedings are
confidential until formal charges have been filed with the Supreme Judicial Court under
section 75, subsection 12. The commission shall establish by rule procedures for ensuring
that commission members and staff maintain the confidentiality required by this
subsection.
2. Exceptions. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1, commission
proceedings are not confidential in the following circumstances.
A. Information obtained by the commission in the course of an investigation closed
prior to the issuance of formal charges may be used in a subsequent commission
proceeding pursuant to section 75, subsection 9.
B. If the judge waives the confidentiality of the proceeding or the subject matter
becomes public through an independent source, the commission may confirm the
pendency of the proceeding, clarify procedural aspects of the proceeding, explain the
judge's right to a fair hearing and indicate whether the judge has denied the allegations
in the proceeding.
C. If the proceeding was initiated as a result either of notoriety or because the conduct
at issue is a matter of public record and the proceeding is subsequently terminated
before the issuance of formal charges, the commission may release information
concerning its decision to terminate the proceeding.
D. In accordance with procedures established by the commission by rule, which must
require reasonable notice to the judge unless the judge has signed a written waiver of
the right to such notice, the commission may disclose information about proceedings:
(1) To any federal or state agency or body established for screening candidates for
judicial appointment if that agency or body seeks information or written materials
from the commission in connection with the selection or appointment of the judge
for a judicial position; or
(2) To the Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court, the Chief Justice of the
Superior Court or the Chief Judge of the District Court if the Chief Justice or Chief
Judge seeks information or written materials from the commission in connection
with the assignment of the judge for duties as an Active Retired Justice or Active
Retired Judge.
3. Confidentiality after filing formal charges. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, commission proceedings may remain confidential after formal charges
have been filed with the Supreme Judicial Court only if the judge, a majority of the
commission and the complainant, if any, all agree in writing based on the nature of the
formal charges or as necessary to protect public safety.
§81. Advisory committee
The Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court may establish an advisory committee
with the authority, in response to the request of a judge or on the advisory committee's own
motion, to issue advisory opinions interpreting the Maine Code of Judicial Conduct.
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §12004-B, sub-§8, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 381, §2, is repealed.
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §12004-G, sub-§23-B is enacted to read:
Page 10 - 132LR0937(01)

23-B.
Judiciary Commission on Judicial Conduct Expenses only 4 MRSA §72
Sec. 5. Staggered terms. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 4,
section 72, subsection 3, an appointing authority for the original appointments of members
of the Commission on Judicial Conduct shall designate 1/3 of the authority's appointments
for 6-year terms, 1/3 of the authority's appointments for 4-year terms and 1/3 of the
authority's appointments for 2-year terms. An initial term of 2 or 4 years may not be
considered a full term for purposes of limiting the number of terms for which a member
may serve.